Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20148-2748
License under Nebraska Sale of Checks
and Funds Transmission Act; how treated.

A license issued under the Nebraska Sale of Checks and Funds
Transmission Act as it existed immediately before January 1, 2014, remains
in force as a license under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act until the
license's expiration date. Thereafter, the licensee shall be treated as if
the licensee had applied for and had received a license under the Nebraska
Money Transmitters Act and shall be required to comply with the renewal requirements
set forth in the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 48.